Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2007XS (2) 91 jm/md S.F. 219 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 427C.14 Program fee. 1 1. Beginning January 1, 2026, each acre of forest and 2 fruit-tree reservation that is exempt from tax pursuant to this 3 chapter shall be subject to a fee to be paid no later than 4 September 1 of each year to the county treasurer of the county 5 where the forest or fruit-tree reservation is located to be 6 deposited into the county general fund. 7 2. Fee rates shall be in the following amounts: 8 a. Subject to paragraph âcâ , for forest and fruit-tree 9 reservations located in the county where the owner of the 10 forest or fruit-tree reservation maintains a homestead for 11 purposes of chapter 425, two dollars per acre. 12 b. Subject to paragraph âcâ , for forest and fruit-tree 13 reservations located in a county that is contiguous to the 14 county where the owner of the forest or fruit-tree reservation 15 maintains a homestead for purposes of chapter 425, three 16 dollars per acre. 17 c. (1) For forest and fruit-tree reservations not described 18 by paragraph âaâ or âbâ , and forest and fruit-tree reservations 19 located inside the corporate limits of a city, a rate per acre 20 equal to the product of the average property taxes due per acre 21 of agricultural property in the county with the most acres 22 of land subject to an exemption under this chapter for the 23 assessment year used to calculate the taxes due and payable 24 in that fiscal year multiplied by the quotient of thirteen 25 divided by the average corn suitability rating for agricultural 26 property located in the county with the most acres of property 27 subject to an exemption under this chapter. 28 (2) The department of management shall make all 29 calculations necessary to determine the fee rate in 30 subparagraph (1) and transmit the rate to each county treasurer 31 no later than July 1 of each year. 32